Illinois, session 104th, HB4849.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Farmer 5Tax Benefit Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose and findings. The General Assembly 7finds that:8        (1) The State of Illinois' unique natural resources, 9    wildlife habitats, open spaces, agricultural and forested 10    resources, wetlands, and historical, cultural, and 11    archaeological resources are of significant economic, 12    environmental, and social benefit to the State and the 13    public.14        (2) The Illinois economy is vulnerable to other states 15    that have financial incentive programs targeted to support 16    the protection of unique natural and agricultural 17    resources. Illinois should advance new tools to ensure 18    that Illinois offers a competitive quality of life and is 19    desirable in site location decision-making for businesses.20        (3) Natural carbon storage and increasing carbon 21    sequestration from natural and working lands is a critical 22    component of State and national deep decarbonization 23    strategies because the maintenance of existing sequestered   HB4849- 2 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1    carbon in intact natural and working lands systems can be 2    among the most cost-effective ways to support climate 3    goals.4        (4) The protection of natural and working lands is an 5    important climate adaptation strategy, with land 6    conservation serving to build community resilience against 7    extreme weather events, such as by absorbing excess 8    rainwater to reduce flooding, filtering pollutants, 9    offering cooling from extreme heat, preserving 10    biodiversity, ensuring species' corridor migration, and 11    protecting productive farmland that provides food 12    security.13        (5) Much of the State's unique natural, historical, 14    agricultural and open space resources and habitats are 15    found on lands that are privately owned. The General 16    Assembly intends to provide private landowners with 17    incentives to encourage voluntary protection of private 18    lands for open space, natural resources, biodiversity 19    conservation, water supply, outdoor recreation, farmland 20    and forestland preservation, historic preservation, and 21    land conservation purposes. 22    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:23    "Conservation agency" means the following:24        (1) the State of Illinois;25        (2) a federal agency;  HB4849- 3 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1        (3) a unit of local government;2        (4) a federally-recognized Indian tribe; or3        (5) a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization that has 4    experience acquiring conservation real estate, whether 5    through purchase, donation, or transfer, and that meets 6    the requirements of Section 170(h)(3) of the Internal 7    Revenue Code and the regulations adopted under that 8    Section. 9    A conservation agency must also:10        (1) be authorized to acquire, hold, and maintain title 11    to real estate or interests in real estate in Illinois; 12        (2) be organized and operated for purposes expressly 13    including natural resource protection, land conservation, 14    or historic preservation; and15        (3) meet other criteria or certifications required by 16    the Department by rule.17        Any non-profit corporation that is accredited through 18the Land Trust Accreditation Commission shall automatically be 19deemed a conservation agency with no further burden of proof.20    "Credit" means the Illinois Land Protection Credit created 21and administered as outlined in this Act.22    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.23    "Federally recognized Indian tribe" means any Indian tribe 24that is included on the list of federally recognized Indian 25tribes that is published from time to time by the United States 26Department of the Interior under the Federally Recognized   HB4849- 4 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1Indian Tribe List Act of 1994.2    "Landowner" means the owner of fee simple title to land, 3as evidenced by the county real property records in the county 4where the real property interest is located, including, 5without limitation, individuals, trusts and estates, and 6entities such as limited liability companies, partnerships, 7and corporations, whether for profit or not-for-profit.8    "Land protection agreement" means a restriction, granted 9in perpetuity and created pursuant to Illinois real property 10law, on the use that may be made of real property, and that 11complies with Section 170(h)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue 12Code.13    "Qualified appraisal" has the same meaning as that term is 14defined in 26 CFR 1.170A-17.15    "Qualified donation" means the transfer and conveyance by 16gift, without consideration, of all or a portion, including 17bargain sales, of a qualified real property interest to a 18conservation agency if those purposes are secured in 19perpetuity through recording of a deed in the real property 20records in the county where the qualified real property 21interest is located.22    "Qualified real property interest" means any of the 23following interests in real property located in the State of 24Illinois:25        (1) fee simple interest;26        (2) a remainder interest; or  HB4849- 5 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1        (3) a land protection agreement.2    A fee simple interest or remainder interest shall not be 3deemed a qualified real property interest unless the 4conservation and preservation purposes are assured in 5perpetuity. In these cases, the credit shall not be allowed 6until the conservation agency agrees in recorded documentation 7that any subsequent conveyances of the fee simple or remainder 8interest in the property will be subject to a prior conveyance 9in perpetuity of a land protection agreement or will be 10conveyed to another conservation agency. 11    Section 15. Credit availability. 12    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 132027, taxpayers may apply to the Department for a credit 14against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act in an amount equal to either 16(i) 100% of the fair market value of a qualified donation of a 17land protection agreement or (ii) 50% of the fair market value 18of the qualified donation of a fee simple interest or a 19remainder interest in qualified real property. The fair market 20value of any donation made under this Section shall be 21substantiated by a qualified appraisal prepared by a qualified 22appraiser. 23    (b) The total aggregate amount of tax credits issued under 24this Act in any State fiscal year shall not exceed $7,500,000. 25Certificates of tax credit shall be allocated on a first-come,   HB4849- 6 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1first-served basis. The Department shall log applications as 2they are received. If the $7,500,000 total aggregate cap is 3exceeded in any one year, the Department shall issue a 4certificate of tax credit to be available to the landowner in 5the subsequent tax year with an effective date of the 6subsequent year.7    (c) The amount of the credit that may be claimed by a 8landowner for any single qualified donation shall not exceed 9$500,000.10    (d) The credit under this Act is exempt from the 11provisions of Section 250. 12    Section 20. Credit allocation by the Department.13    (a) A landowner seeking to claim a tax credit under 14Section 15 above shall, in either the year of the donation or 15the year following the year of donation, submit to the 16Department an application for a land protection tax credit on 17a form to be created by the Department. The application shall 18be accompanied by the qualified appraisal substantiating the 19value of the qualified donation and the deed transferring the 20qualified real property interest. If the landowner is a 21pass-through entity, the application shall also include 22documentation that the landowner has owned the property for 23more than 3 years at the time of the donation or otherwise 24meets the family exception set forth in Section 40.25    (b) On receipt of the application and all supporting   HB4849- 7 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1documentation, the Department shall either (i) record the 2transaction and provide the landowner with a certificate 3acknowledging the credit, together with a tracking number, on 4a form to be created by the Department, (ii) request more 5information, or (iii) decline to issue the certificate by 6providing a written statement of the deficiencies in the 7application. The landowner shall have an opportunity to cure 8any deficiencies. The Department shall make its determination 9within 60 days of receipt of the application. If no 10determination is made within 60 days after receipt, the credit 11shall be deemed automatically granted.12    If the landowner is receiving compensation for any 13non-donated portion of a qualified real property interest and 14that compensation derives from a federal, State, or local 15public conservation funding source, then the landowner shall 16include, with the application, documentation confirming the 17award of public funding towards the qualified real property 18interest. In that case, the public funding award shall be 19determinative of the conservation benefit and value, no 20additional review by the Department shall be necessary, and 21the credit shall be automatically granted and the certificate 22automatically issued. 23    Section 25. Allowable credit use.24    (a) If the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 25for the year, the excess may be carried forward and applied to   HB4849- 8 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 2credit year. In no event shall a credit under this Section 3reduce the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. The 4landowner shall submit a copy of the certificate of tax credit 5with its tax returns for the year of the claimed credit.6    (b) A sale, assignment, or transfer of the tax credit may 7be made by the taxpayer earning the credit at any time during 8the 5-year carry forward period. Upon notice of transfer, the 9Department shall issue transfer certificates to the transferor 10and transferee that identify the amount of the credit 11transferred. Upon issuance of the transfer certificates, the 12transferor relinquishes all rights to the portion of the 13credit that was transferred. The transferred credit may be 14applied by the transferee against its tax imposed by the 15Illinois Income Tax Act, and any credit not used by the 16transferee may be carried forward for the remainder of the 17original 5-year carry forward period. A landowner seeking to 18transfer a credit shall submit to the Department a Notice of 19Tax Credit Transfer on a form to be created by the Department. 20Upon any transfer of a credit, a fee equal to 2.5% of the 21amount of the credit so transferred shall be paid to the 22Department by the landowner to cover the administrative costs 23of this process. 24    Section 30. Powers of the Department. 25    (a) The Department, in addition to those powers granted   HB4849- 9 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1under the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois, is granted 2and has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and 3effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Act, including, 4but not limited to, power and authority to:5        (1) Adopt rules deemed necessary and appropriate for 6    the administration of the tax credit program.7        (2) Establish forms for applications, notifications, 8    contracts, or any other agreements and accept applications 9    at any time during the year.10        (3) Assist applicants pursuant to the provisions of 11    this Act to promote, foster, and support land conservation 12    and its related benefits within the State.13        (4) Gather information and conduct inquiries in the 14    manner and by the methods as it deems desirable.15        (5) Provide for sufficient personnel to permit 16    administration, staffing, operation, and related support 17    required to adequately discharge its duties and 18    responsibilities described in this Act from funds as may 19    be appropriated by the General Assembly for the 20    administration of this Act.21        (6) Require applicants, upon written request, to issue 22    any necessary authorization to the appropriate federal, 23    State, or local authority for the release of information 24    concerning a project being considered under the provisions 25    of this Act, with the information requested to include, 26    but not be limited to, financial reports, returns, or   HB4849- 10 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1    records.2    (b) The Department shall adopt rules within 6 months after 3the effective date of this Act. 4    Section 35. Analysis of the Illinois Land Protection Tax 5Credit. 6    (a) By December 31, 2032, the Department, in consultation 7with other State agencies as needed, shall prepare a report 8detailing the amount of land and the fair market value of land 9protected during the reporting period pursuant to this Act. 10The Department may consider application and attestation 11information provided by eligible taxpayers pursuant to this 12Act and any other data it deems relevant.13    (b) The final report shall be made publicly available, and 14copies of the final report shall be filed with the General 15Assembly and the Governor. 16    Section 40. Applicability and limitations. 17    (a) Any tax credits arising under this Act from a 18qualified donation made by a pass-through tax entity, such as 19a trust, estate, limited liability corporation, or 20partnership, limited partnership, subchapter S corporation, or 21other fiduciary, shall be used either by that entity, if it is 22the taxpayer on behalf of such entity, or by the member, 23manager, partner, shareholder, or beneficiary, as the case may 24be, in proportion to the person's interest in the entity, if   HB4849- 11 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1that income tax liability passes through such entity to such 2member, manager, partner, shareholder, beneficiary. Tax 3credits may not be claimed by both the entity and the member, 4manager, partner, shareholder, or beneficiary for the same 5qualified donation. In the case of a pass-through entity 6described above, no qualified donation shall be eligible for a 7tax credit under this Act unless the entity acquired the land 8or qualified real property interest 3 or more years before the 9donation for which the qualified donation is being sought.10    (b) Subsection (a) shall not apply with respect to any 11qualified donation by any partnership or pass-through entity 12for which a tax credit is being sought under this Act if 13substantially all of the partnership interests or pass-through 14entity interests in the partnership or pass-through entity are 15held, directly or indirectly, by an individual or members of 16the individual's family. 17    As used in this subsection, "member of the family" means 18the individual's spouse or any person who bears a relationship 19to the individual that is described in Internal Revenue Code 20Section 152(d)(2) subparagraphs (A) through (G).21    (c) If a conservation agency becomes unqualified after the 22effective date of a qualified donation, it shall not require 23any taxpayer to repay tax credits claimed under this Act, nor 24shall such event be cause for any other penalty to be imposed 25on a taxpayer.    HB4849- 12 -LRB104 17527 HLH 30954 b1    Section 45. Construction. 2    (a) Nothing in this Act shall be interpreted to in any way 3alter or amend any permit requirements, reporting 4requirements, allocation procedures, or other requirements set 5forth in any other provision of State law.6    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 7a land protection agreement held pursuant to this Section 8shall be construed in favor of achieving the conservation 9purposes for which it was created. 10    Section 900. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 11adding Section 253 as follows: 12    (35 ILCS 5/253 new)13    Sec. 253. Farmer Tax Benefit Act. A taxpayer who has been 14awarded a credit under the Farmer Tax Benefit Act is entitled 15to a credit as provided in that Act.